Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 354.05, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 44. new text end new text begin Medical provider. new text end new text begin "Medical provider" means an individual licensed as a physician, chiropractor, physician assistant, APRN, or, with respect to a mental impairment, a psychologist. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 354.07, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Investigatory powers. In passing upon all applications and claims, the board may summon, swear, hear, and examine witnesses and, in the case of claims for disability benefits, may require the claimant to submit to a medical examination by a deleted text begin physiciandeleted text end new text begin medical providernew text end of the board's choice, at the expense of the claimant, as a condition precedent to the passing on the claim, and, in the case of all applications and claims, may conduct investigations necessary to determine the validity and merit of the same. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 354.48, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Determination by executive director. (a) The executive director deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end have the member examined by deleted text begin at least two licensed physicians, licensed chiropractors, or licensed psychologistsdeleted text end new text begin one or more medical providersnew text end . (b) deleted text begin These physicians, chiropractors, APRNs, or psychologists with respect to a mental impairment, shalldeleted text end new text begin The medical providers selected under paragraph (a) mustnew text end make written reports to the executive director concerning the member's disability, including expert opinions as to whether or not the member is permanently and totally disabled within the meaning of section 354.05, subdivision 14. (c) The executive director deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end also obtain written certification from the last employer stating whether or not the member was separated from service because of a disability deleted text begin whichdeleted text end new text begin thatnew text end would reasonably prevent further service to the employer and as a consequence the member is not entitled to compensation from the employer. (d) If, upon the consideration of the reports deleted text begin of the physicians, chiropractors, APRNs, or psychologistsdeleted text end new text begin required under paragraph (b)new text end and any other evidence presented by the member or by others interested therein, the executive director finds that the member is totally and permanently disabled, the executive director deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end grant the member a disability benefit. (e) An employee who is placed on leave of absence without compensation because of disability is not barred from receiving a disability benefit. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 354.48, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Regular physical examinations. At least once each year during the first five years following the allowance of a disability benefit to any member, and at least once in every three-year period thereafter, the executive director may require the disability benefit recipient to undergo an expert examination by deleted text begin a physician or physicians, by a chiropractor or chiropractors, by an APRN or APRNs, or bydeleted text end one or more deleted text begin psychologists with respect to a mental impairment,deleted text end new text begin medical providers new text end engaged by the executive director. If an examination indicates that the member is no longer permanently and totally disabled or that the member is engaged or is able to engage in a substantial gainful occupation, new text begin the association must discontinue new text end payments of the disability benefit deleted text begin by the association must be discontinueddeleted text end . The payments must be discontinued as soon as the member is reinstated to the payroll following sick leave, but payment may not be made for more than 60 days after the deleted text begin physicians, chiropractors, APRNs, or psychologistsdeleted text end new text begin medical provider or medical providersnew text end engaged by the executive director find that the person is no longer permanently and totally disabled. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end